Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-12] Exclusive basis. This part
provides the exclusive jurisdictional basis for a court of the State of Hawaii
to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for an adult. [L 2012, c 236,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next